test/weight/dix.lexd
PATTERNS
NounStem NounAffix
VerbStem VerbAffix

LEXICON NounStem
potato
sock
ninja
table

LEXICON VerbStem
destroy
sing
eat
yodel
table

LEXICON NounAffix
<n><sg>:
<n><pl>:s

LEXICON VerbAffix
<vblex><inf>:
<vblex><imp>:
<vblex><pres>:
